Utah statutes.
13-34-110.   Enforcement of contracts or agreements -- Rescission based on
defective registration statement.
(1)  A proprietary school shall be unable to enforce in the courts of this
state any contract or agreement relating to postsecondary education services
in this state unless, at the time the contract or agreement was entered into,
an effective registration statement was on file with the division and made
accessible to every applicant at the time of admission to the school.
(2)  It is a violation of this chapter if a proprietary school or its agent:
(a)  fails to file an effective registration statement;
(b)  willfully omits from a registration statement provided under Section
13-34-107 any material statement of fact required by this chapter and
applicable regulations; or
(c)  includes in a registration statement any material statement of fact that
was known, or should have been known, to the proprietary school to be false,
deceptive, inaccurate, or misleading.
(3)  A student who enrolled in a proprietary school, in reliance upon the
school's registration statement, may rescind the contract or agreement of
enrollment and obtain a refund from the school of all tuition, fees, and other
charges paid to the school if the school or its agent committed a violation
under Subsection (2).
(4)  A violation of this chapter is also a violation of Section 13-11-4.
